Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1102] Powers of board. The
board of regents shall have authority to establish and govern community
colleges. The board shall have the same powers with respect to the community
colleges that it has as to the university in general. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next